California statutes. Commercial Code
(2) The amount of proceeds of the disposition.

(3) The aggregate amount of the obligations after deducting the amount of proceeds.

(4) The amount, in the aggregate or by type, and types of expenses, including expenses of retaking, holding, preparing for disposition, processing, and disposing of the collateral, and attorney’s fees secured by the collateral which are known to the secured party and relate to the current disposition.

(5) The amount, in the aggregate or by type, and
 types of credits, including rebates of interest or credit service charges, to which the obligor is known to be entitled and which are not reflected in the amount in paragraph (1).

(6) The amount of the surplus or deficiency.

(d) A particular phrasing of the explanation is not required. An explanation complying substantially with the requirements of subdivision (a) is sufficient, even if it includes minor errors that are not seriously misleading.

(e) A debtor or consumer obligor is entitled without charge to one response to a request under this section during any six-month
 period in which the secured party did not send to the debtor or consumer obligor an explanation pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b). The secured party may require payment of a charge not exceeding twenty-five dollars ($25) for each additional response.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 68.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9617.

(a) A secured party’s disposition of collateral after default does all of the following:

(1) Transfers to a transferee for value all of the debtor’s rights in the collateral.

(2) Discharges the security interest under which the disposition is made.

(3) Discharges any subordinate security interest or other subordinate lien.

(b) A transferee that acts in good faith takes free of the rights and interests described in subdivision (a), even if the secured party fails to comply with this division or the requirements of any judicial proceeding.

(c) If a transferee does not take free of the rights and interests described in subdivision (a), the transferee takes the collateral subject to all of the following:

(1) The debtor’s rights in the collateral.

(2) The security interest or agricultural lien under which the disposition is made.

(3) Any other security interest or other lien.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9618.

(a) A secondary obligor acquires the rights and becomes obligated to perform the duties of the secured party after any of the following occurs:

(1) The secondary obligor receives an assignment of a secured obligation from the secured party.

(2) The secondary obligor receives a transfer of collateral from the secured party and agrees to accept the rights and assume the duties of the secured
 party.

(3) The secondary obligor is subrogated to the rights of a secured party with respect to collateral.

(b) Both of the following rules apply with respect to an assignment, transfer, or subrogation described in subdivision (a):

(1) It is not a disposition of collateral under Section 9610.

(2) It relieves the secured party of further duties under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9619.

(a) In this section, “transfer statement” means a record signed by a secured party stating all of the following:

(1) That the debtor has defaulted in connection with an obligation secured by specified collateral.

(2) That the secured party has exercised its postdefault remedies with respect to the collateral.

(3) That, by reason of the exercise, a transferee has acquired the rights of the debtor in the collateral.

(4) The name and mailing address of the secured party, debtor, and
 transferee.

(b) A transfer statement entitles the transferee to the transfer of record of all rights of the debtor in the collateral specified in the statement in any official filing, recording, registration, or certificate of title system covering the collateral. If a transfer statement is presented with the applicable fee and request form to the official or office responsible for maintaining the system, the official or office shall do all of the following:

(1) Accept the transfer statement.

(2) Promptly amend its records to reflect the transfer.

(3) If applicable, issue a new appropriate certificate of title in the name of the transferee.

(c) A transfer of the record or legal title to collateral to a secured party under subdivision (b) or otherwise is not of itself a disposition of collateral under this division and does not of itself relieve the secured party of its duties under this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 69.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9620.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (g), a secured party may accept collateral in full or partial satisfaction of the obligation it secures only if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The debtor consents to the acceptance under subdivision (c).

(2) The secured party does not receive, within the time set forth in subdivision (d), a notification of objection to the proposal signed by either of the following:

(A) A person to which the secured party was required to send a proposal under
 Section 9621.

(B) Any other person, other than the debtor, holding an interest in the collateral subordinate to the security interest that is the subject of the proposal.

(3) If the collateral is consumer goods, the collateral is not in the possession of the debtor when the debtor consents to the acceptance.

(4) Subdivision (e) does not require the secured party to dispose of the collateral or the debtor waives the requirement pursuant to Section 9624.

(b) A purported or apparent acceptance of collateral under this section is ineffective unless both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The secured party consents to the acceptance in a signed record or sends a proposal to the debtor.

(2) The conditions of subdivision (a) are met.

(c) For purposes of this section both of the following rules apply:

(1) A debtor consents to an acceptance of collateral in partial satisfaction of the obligation it secures only if the debtor agrees to the terms of the acceptance in a record signed after default.

(2) A debtor consents to an acceptance of collateral in full satisfaction of the obligation it secures only if the debtor agrees to the terms of the acceptance in a record signed
 after default or the secured party does all of the following:

(A) Sends to the debtor after default a proposal that is unconditional or subject only to a condition that collateral not in the possession of the secured party be preserved or maintained.

(B) In the proposal, proposes to accept collateral in full satisfaction of the obligation it secures.

(C) Does not receive a notification of objection signed by the debtor within 20 days after the proposal is sent.

(d) To be effective under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), a notification of objection must be received by the secured party as follows:

(1) In the case of a person to which the proposal was sent pursuant to Section 9621, within 20 days after notification was sent to that person.

(2) In other cases, in accordance with either of the following:

(A) Within 20 days after the last notification was sent pursuant to Section 9621.

(B) If a notification was not sent, before the debtor consents to the acceptance under subdivision (c).

(e) A secured party that has taken possession of collateral shall dispose of the collateral pursuant to Section 9610 within the time specified in subdivision (f) if either of the following conditions has been satisfied:

(1) Sixty percent of the cash price has been paid in the case of a purchase money security interest in consumer goods.

(2) Sixty percent of the principal amount of the obligation secured has been paid in the case of a nonpurchase money security interest in consumer goods.

(f) To comply with subdivision (e), the secured party shall dispose of the collateral within either of the following time periods:

(1) Within 90 days after taking possession.

(2) Within any longer period to which the debtor and all secondary obligors have agreed in an agreement to that effect entered into and signed after default.

(g) In a consumer transaction, a secured party may not accept collateral in partial satisfaction of the obligation it secures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 70.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9621.

(a) A secured party that desires to accept collateral in full or partial satisfaction of the obligation it secures shall send its proposal to all of the following persons:

(1) Any person from which the secured party has received, before the debtor consented to the acceptance, a signed notification of a claim of an interest in the collateral.

(2) Any other secured party or lienholder that, 10 days before the debtor consented to the acceptance, held a security interest in or other lien on the collateral perfected by the filing of a financing statement that satisfied all of the following
 conditions:

(A) It identified the collateral.

(B) It was indexed under the debtor’s name as of that date.

(C) It was filed in the office or offices in which to file a financing statement against the debtor covering the collateral as of that date.

(3) Any other secured party that, 10 days before the debtor consented to the acceptance, held a security interest in the collateral perfected by compliance with a statute, regulation, or treaty described in subdivision (a) of Section 9311.

(b) A secured party that desires to accept collateral in partial satisfaction of the obligation it secures shall send
 its proposal to any secondary obligor in addition to the persons described in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 71.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9622.

(a) A secured party’s acceptance of collateral in full or partial satisfaction of the obligation it secures does all of the following:

(1) It discharges the obligation to the extent consented to by the debtor.

(2) It transfers to the secured party all of a debtor’s rights in the collateral.

(3) It discharges the security
 interest or agricultural lien that is the subject of the debtor’s consent and any subordinate security interest or other subordinate lien.

(4) It terminates any other subordinate interest.

(b) A subordinate interest is discharged or terminated under subdivision (a), even if the secured party fails to comply with this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9623.

(a) A debtor, any secondary obligor, or any other secured party or lienholder may redeem collateral.

(b) To redeem collateral, a person shall tender both of the following:

(1) Fulfillment of all obligations secured by the collateral.

(2) The reasonable expenses and attorney’s fees described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a)
 of Section 9615.

(c) A redemption may occur at any time before a secured party has done any of the following:

(1) Collected collateral under Section 9607.

(2) Disposed of collateral or entered into a contract for its disposition under Section 9610.

(3) Accepted collateral in full or partial satisfaction of the obligation it secures under Section 9622.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9624.

(a) A debtor or secondary obligor may waive the right to notification of disposition of collateral under Section 9611 only by an agreement to that effect entered into and signed after default.

(b) A debtor may waive the right to require disposition of collateral under subdivision (e) of Section 9620 only by an agreement to that effect entered into and signed after default.

(c) Except in a consumer-goods transaction, a debtor or secondary obligor may waive the right to redeem collateral under Section 9623 only by an agreement to that effect entered into and signed after
 default.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 72.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9625.

(a) If it is established that a secured party is not proceeding in accordance with this division, a court may order or restrain collection, enforcement, or disposition of collateral on appropriate terms and conditions.

(b) Subject to subdivisions (c), (d), and (f), a person is liable for damages in the amount of any loss caused by a failure to comply with this division. Loss caused by a failure to comply may include loss resulting from the debtor’s
 inability to obtain, or increased costs of, alternative financing.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in Section 9628, a person that, at the time of the failure, was a debtor, was an obligor, or held a security interest in or other lien on the collateral may recover damages under subdivision (b) for its loss.

(d) A debtor whose deficiency is eliminated under Section 9626 may recover damages for the loss of any surplus. However, in a transaction other than a consumer transaction, a debtor or secondary obligor whose deficiency is eliminated or reduced under Section 9626 may not otherwise recover under subdivision (b) for noncompliance with the provisions of this chapter relating to collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance.

(e) In addition to any damages recoverable under subdivision (b), the debtor, consumer
 obligor, or person named as a debtor in a filed record, as applicable, may recover five hundred dollars ($500) in each case from any of the following persons:

(1) A person that fails to comply with Section 9208.

(2) A person that fails to comply with Section 9209.

(3) A person that files a record that the person is not entitled to file under subdivision (a) of Section 9509.

(4) A person that fails to cause the secured party of record to file or send a termination statement as required by subdivision (a) or (c) of Section 9513.

(5) A person that fails to comply with paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 9616 and whose failure is part of a pattern, or consistent with a practice, of
 noncompliance.

(6) A person that fails to comply with paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 9616.

(f) A debtor or consumer obligor may recover damages under subdivision (b) and, in addition, five hundred dollars ($500) in each case from a person that, without reasonable cause, fails to comply with a request under Section 9210. A recipient of a request under Section 9210 which never claimed an interest in the collateral or obligations that are the subject of a request under that section has a reasonable excuse for failure to comply with the request within the meaning of this subdivision.

(g) If a secured party fails to comply with a request regarding a list of collateral or a statement of account under Section 9210, the secured party may claim a security interest only as shown in the list or statement included
 in the request as against a person that is reasonably misled by the failure.

(History: Amended (as to be added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991) by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1003, Sec. 46.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Addition and amendment operative July 1, 2001, by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 75, and Stats. 2000, Ch. 1003, Sec. 56.)
-------------------------------------------

9626.

(a) In an action arising from a transaction, other than a consumer transaction, in which the amount of a deficiency or surplus is in issue, the following rules apply:

(1) A secured party need not prove compliance with the provisions of this chapter relating to collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance unless the debtor or a secondary obligor places the secured party’s compliance in issue.

(2) If the secured party’s compliance is placed in issue, the secured party has the burden of establishing that the collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance was conducted in accordance with this chapter.

(3) Except as otherwise provided in Section 9628, if a secured party fails to prove that the collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance was conducted in accordance with the provisions of this chapter relating to collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance, the liability of a debtor or a secondary obligor for a deficiency is limited to an amount by which the sum of the secured obligation, expenses, and attorney’s fees exceeds the greater of either of the following:

(A) The proceeds of the collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance.

(B) The amount of proceeds that would
 have been realized had the noncomplying secured party proceeded in accordance with the provisions of this chapter relating to collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance.

(4) For purposes of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3), the amount of proceeds that would have been realized is equal to the sum of the secured obligation, expenses, and attorney’s fees unless the secured party proves that the amount is less than that sum.

(5) If a deficiency or surplus is calculated under subdivision (f) of Section 9615, the debtor or obligor has the burden of establishing that the amount of proceeds of the disposition is significantly below the range of prices that a complying disposition to a person other than the secured party, a person related to the secured party, or a secondary obligor would have brought.

(b) In a
 consumer transaction, the following rules apply:

(1) In an action in which a deficiency or a surplus is an issue:

(A) A secured party has the burden of proving compliance with the provisions of this chapter relating to collection, enforcement, disposition, and acceptance whether or not the debtor or a secondary obligor places the secured party’s compliance in issue.

(B) If a deficiency or surplus is calculated under subdivision (f) of Section 9615, the secured party has the burden of establishing that the amount of proceeds of the disposition is not significantly below the range of prices that a complying disposition to a person other than the secured party, a person related to the secured party, or a secondary obligor would have brought.

(2) The debtor
 or any secondary obligor is liable for any deficiency only if all of the following conditions are met:

(A) It is not otherwise agreed or otherwise provided in the Retail Installment Sales Act (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1801), Title 2, Part 4, Division 3, Civil Code), and, in particular, Section 1812.5 of the Civil Code or any other statute.

(B) The debtor and obligor were given notice, in accordance with Sections 9611, 9612, and 9613, or Section 9614, as applicable, of the disposition of the collateral.

(C) The collection, enforcement, disposition, and acceptance by the secured party were conducted in good faith and in a commercially reasonable manner.

(3) Upon entry of a final judgment that the debtor or obligor is not liable for a deficiency
 by reason of paragraph (2) or subdivision (f) of Section 9615, the secured party may neither obtain a deficiency judgment nor retain a security interest in any other collateral of the debtor or obligor that secured the indebtedness for which the debtor or obligor is no longer liable.

(4) If, subsequent to a disposition that does not satisfy any one or more of the conditions set forth in paragraph (2), or subsequent to a disposition that is subject to subdivision (f) of Section 9615, the secured party disposes pursuant to this section of other collateral securing the same indebtedness, the debtor or obligor may, to the extent he or she is no longer liable for a deficiency judgment by reason of paragraph (2) or subdivision (f) of Section 9615, recover the proceeds realized from the subsequent dispositions, as well as any damages to which the debtor may be entitled if the subsequent disposition is itself noncomplying or otherwise wrongful.

(5) Nothing herein shall deprive the debtor of any right to recover damages from the secured party under subdivision (b) of Section 9625, or to offset any such damages against any claim by the secured party for a deficiency, or of any right or remedy to which the debtor may be entitled under any other law. A debtor or obligor in a consumer transaction shall not have any damages owed to it reduced by the amount of any deficiency that would have resulted had the disposition of the collateral by the secured party been conducted in conformity with this division.

(6) The secured party shall account to the debtor for any surplus, except as provided in Section 701.040 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended (as to be added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991) by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1003, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Addition and amendment operative July 1, 2001, by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 75, and Stats. 2000, Ch. 1003, Sec. 56.)
-------------------------------------------

9627.

(a) The fact that a greater amount could have been obtained by a collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance at a different time or in a different method from that selected by the secured party is not of itself sufficient to preclude the secured party from establishing that the collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance was made in a commercially reasonable manner.

(b) A disposition of collateral is made in a commercially reasonable
 manner if the disposition satisfies any of the following conditions:

(1) It is made in the usual manner on any recognized market.

(2) It is made at the price current in any recognized market at the time of the disposition.

(3) It is made otherwise in conformity with reasonable commercial practices among dealers in the type of property that was the subject of the disposition.

(c) A collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance is commercially reasonable if it has been approved in or by any of the following:

(1) In a judicial proceeding.

(2) By a bona fide creditors’ committee.

(3) By a representative of creditors.

(4) By an assignee for the benefit of creditors.

(d) Approval under subdivision (c) need not be obtained, and lack of approval does not mean that the collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance is not commercially reasonable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9628.

(a) Subject to subdivision (e), unless a secured party knows that a person is a debtor or obligor, knows the identity of the person, and knows how to communicate with the person both of the following rules apply:

(1) The secured party is not liable to the person, or to a secured party or lienholder that has filed a financing statement against the person, for failure to comply with this division.

(2) The secured party’s failure to comply with this division does not affect the liability of the person for a deficiency.

(b) Subject to
 subdivision (e), a secured party is not liable because of its status as secured party to either of the following persons:

(1) To a person that is a debtor or obligor, unless the secured party knows all of the following:

(A) That the person is a debtor or obligor.

(B) The identity of the person.

(C) How to communicate with the person.

(2) To a secured party or lienholder that has filed a financing statement against a person, unless the secured party knows both of the following:

(A) That the person is a debtor.

(B) The identity of the person.

(c) A secured party is not liable to any person, and a person’s liability for a deficiency is not affected, because of any act or omission arising out of the secured party’s reasonable belief that a transaction is not a consumer-goods transaction or a consumer transaction or that goods are not consumer goods, if the secured party’s belief is based on its reasonable reliance on either of the following representations:

(1) A debtor’s representation concerning the purpose for which collateral was to be used, acquired, or held.

(2) An obligor’s representation concerning the purpose for which a secured obligation was incurred.

(d) A secured party is not liable under paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 9625 more than once with respect to any one secured obligation.

(e) Subdivisions (a) and (b) do not apply to limit the liability of a secured party to a person if, at the time the secured party obtains control of collateral that is a controllable account, controllable electronic record, or controllable payment intangible or at the time the security interest attaches to the collateral, whichever is later, both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The person is a debtor or obligor.

(2) The secured party knows that the information in subparagraph (A), (B), or (C) of
 paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) relating to the person is not provided by the collateral, a record attached to or logically associated with the collateral, or the system in which the collateral is recorded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 73.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9629.

No renunciation or modification by the debtor of any of his or her rights under this chapter as to consumer goods shall be valid or enforceable unless the renunciation or modification is in consideration of a waiver by the secured party of any right to a deficiency on the debt.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Transition [9701. - 9709.]

9701.

This division shall become operative on July 1, 2001.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

9702.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, this division applies to a transaction or lien within its scope, even if the transaction or lien was entered into or created before this division takes effect.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c) and in Sections 9703 to 9709, inclusive, both of the following rules apply:

(1) Transactions and liens that were not governed by former Division 9, were validly entered into or created before July 1, 2001, and would be subject to this act if they had been entered into or created after July 1, 2001, and the rights, duties, and interests flowing from those transactions and liens remain valid after July 1, 2001.

(2) The transactions and liens may be terminated, completed, consummated, and enforced as required or permitted by this division or by the law that otherwise would apply if this division had not taken effect.

(c) This division does not affect an action, case, or proceeding commenced before July 1, 2001.

(History: Amended (as to be added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991) by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1003, Sec. 48.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Addition and amendment operative July 1, 2001, by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 75, and Stats. 2000, Ch. 1003, Sec. 56.)
-------------------------------------------

9703.

(a) A security interest that is enforceable immediately before July 1, 2001, and would have priority over the rights of a person that becomes a lien creditor at that time is a perfected security interest under this division if, on July 1, 2001, the applicable requirements for enforceability and perfection under this division are satisfied without further action.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in Section 9705, if, immediately before July 1, 2001, a security interest is enforceable and would have priority over the rights of a person that becomes a lien creditor at that time, but the applicable requirements for enforceability or perfection under this division are not satisfied on July 1, 2001, when all of the following rules apply with respect to the security interest:

(1) It is a perfected
 security interest until July 1, 2002.

(2) It remains enforceable thereafter only if the security interest becomes enforceable under Section 9203 before July 1, 2002.

(3) It remains perfected thereafter only if the applicable requirements for perfection under this division are satisfied before July 1, 2002.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9704.

All of the following rules apply with respect to a security interest that is enforceable immediately before July 1, 2001, but which would be subordinate to the rights of a person that becomes a lien creditor at that time:

(1) It remains an enforceable security interest until July 1, 2002.

(2) It remains enforceable thereafter if the security interest becomes enforceable under Section 9203 on July 1, 2001, or on July 1, 2002.

(3) It becomes perfected in either of the following ways:

(A) Without further action, on July 1, 2001, if the applicable requirements for perfection under this division are satisfied on or before that time.

(B) When the applicable requirements for perfection are satisfied if the requirements are satisfied after that
 time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9705.

(a) If action, other than the filing of a financing statement, is taken before July 1, 2001, and the action would have resulted in priority of a security interest over the rights of a person that becomes a lien creditor had the security interest become enforceable before July 1, 2001, the action is effective to perfect a security interest that attaches under this division on or before July 1, 2002. An attached security interest becomes unperfected on July 1, 2002, unless the security interest becomes a perfected security interest under this division before that date.

(b) The filing of a financing statement before July 1, 2001, is effective to perfect a security interest to the extent the filing would satisfy the applicable requirements for perfection under this division.

(c) This division does not render ineffective an effective financing statement that, before July 1, 2001, is filed and satisfies the applicable requirements for perfection under the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in former Section 9103. However, except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (d) and (e) and in Section 9706, the financing statement ceases to be effective at the earlier of either of the following:

(1) The time the financing statement would have ceased to be effective under the law of the jurisdiction in which it is filed.

(2) June 30, 2006.

(d) The filing of a continuation statement after July 1, 2001, does not continue the effectiveness of the financing statement filed before July 1, 2001. However, upon the timely filing of a continuation statement after July 1, 2001, and in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 9301), the effectiveness of a financing statement filed in the same office in that jurisdiction before July 1, 2001, continues for the period provided by the law of that jurisdiction.

(e) Paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) applies to a financing statement that, before July 1, 2001, is filed against a transmitting utility and satisfies the applicable requirements for perfection under the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in former Section 9103 only to the extent that Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 9301) provides that the law of a jurisdiction other than the jurisdiction in which the financing statement is filed governs perfection of a security interest in collateral covered by the financing statement.

(f) A financing statement that includes a financing statement filed before July 1, 2001, and a continuation statement filed after July 1, 2001, is effective only to the extent that it satisfies the requirements of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 9501) for an initial financing statement.

(History: Amended (as to be added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991) by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1003, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Addition and amendment operative July 1, 2001, by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 75, and Stats. 2000, Ch. 1003, Sec. 56.)
-------------------------------------------

9706.

(a) The filing of an initial financing statement in the office specified in Section 9501 continues the effectiveness of a financing statement filed before July 1, 2001, if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The filing of an initial financing statement in that office would be effective to perfect a security interest under this division.

(2) The preeffective date financing statement was filed in an office in another state or another office in this state.

(3) The initial financing statement satisfies subdivision (c).

(b) The filing of an initial financing statement under subdivision (a) continues the effectiveness of the preeffective date financing statement for the following periods:

(1) If the initial financing statement is filed before July 1, 2001, for the period provided in former Section 9403 with respect to a financing statement.

(2) If the initial financing statement is filed after July 1, 2001, for the period provided in Section 9515 with respect to an initial financing statement.

(c) To be effective for purposes of subdivision (a), an initial financing statement must do all of the following:

(1) Satisfy the requirements of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 9501) for an initial financing statement.

(2) Identify the preeffective date financing statement by indicating the office in which the financing statement was filed and providing the dates of filing and file numbers, if any, of the financing statement and of the most recent continuation statement filed with respect to the financing statement.

(3) Indicate that the preeffective date financing statement remains effective.

(History: Amended (as to be added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991) by Stats. 2000, Ch. 135, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Addition and amendment operative July 1, 2001, pursuant to Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 75, and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9707.

(a) In this section, “pre-effective-date financing statement” means a financing statement filed before the date that this section becomes operative.

(b) After the date this section becomes operative, a person may add or delete collateral covered by, continue or terminate the effectiveness of, or otherwise amend the information provided in, a pre-effective-date financing statement only in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 9301). However, the effectiveness of a pre-effective-date financing statement also may be terminated in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction in which the financing statement is filed.

(c) Except as otherwise provided by subdivision (d), if the law of this state governs perfection of a security interest, the information in a pre-effective-date financing statement may be amended after the date this section becomes operative only if any of the following occur:

(1) The pre-effective-date financing statement and an amendment are filed in the office specified in Section 9501.

(2) An amendment is filed in the office specified in Section 9501 concurrently with, or after the filing in that office of, an initial financing statement that satisfies subdivision (c) of Section 9706.

(3) An initial financing statement that provides the information as amended and satisfies subdivision (c) of Section 9706 is filed in the office specified in Section 9501.

(d) If the law of this state governs perfection of a security interest, the effectiveness of a pre-effective-date financing statement may be continued only under subdivisions (d) and (f) of Section 9705 or Section 9706.

(e) Whether or not the law of this state governs the perfection of a security interest, the effectiveness of a pre-effective-date financing statement filed in this state may be terminated after the date that this section becomes operative by filing a termination statement in the office in which the pre-effective-date financing statement is filed, unless an initial filing statement that satisfies subdivision (c) of Section 9706 has been filed in the office specified by the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 9301) as the office in which to file a financing statement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1003, Sec. 51.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 56 of Ch. 1003.)
-------------------------------------------

9708.

A person may file an initial financing statement or a continuation statement under this chapter if both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The secured party of record authorizes the filing.

(2) The filing is necessary under this chapter to do either of the following:

(A) To continue the effectiveness of a financing statement filed before July 1, 2001.

(B) To perfect or continue the perfection of a security interest.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 9707 (as to be added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991) by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1003, Sec. 50.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Addition (as Section 9707) and renumbering amendment operative July 1, 2001, by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 75, and Stats. 2000, Ch. 1003, Sec. 56.)
-------------------------------------------

9709.

(a) This division determines priority of conflicting claims to collateral. However, if the relative priorities of the claims were established before July 1, 2001, former Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101) determines priority.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a) of Section 9322, the priority of a security interest that becomes enforceable under Section 9203 dates from July 1, 2001, if the security interest is perfected under this division by the filing of a financing statement before July 1, 2001, which would not have been effective to perfect the security interest under former Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101). This subdivision does not apply to conflicting security interests each of which is perfected by the filing of such a financing statement.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 9708 (as to be added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991) by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1003, Sec. 52.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Addition (as Section 9708) and renumbering amendment operative July 1, 2001, by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 75, and Stats. 2000, Ch. 1003, Sec. 56.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Transition Provisions for 2010 Amendments [9801. - 9809.]

9801.

The changes to this division made by the act adding this chapter shall become operative on July 1, 2014.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 531, Sec. 23.   (AB 502)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Operative July 1, 2014, by Sec. 28 of Ch. 531.)
-------------------------------------------

9802.
